Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB581.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 14 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "qualified jailer" means an individual who:
(a) Is currently serving or previously served as a duly elected or appointed jailer
in the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(b) Has not been:
1. Removed from office; or
2. Disqualified from holding office under the Constitution of Kentucky
or the Kentucky Revised Statutes.
(2) The Secretary of State shall issue a jailer service card to a qualified jailer who
applies to receive a card under this section. The jailer service card shall serve as
an acknowledgement by the Secretary of State that the cardholder currently
serves or previously served as a jailer in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(3) The Secretary of State shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
(a) Protocols for verifying the identity of the applicant and that the applicant is
a qualified jailer;
(b) The form of applications for the issuance of a jailer service card;
(c) The design and printed content of the jailer service card which shall, at a
minimum:
1. Identify the cardholder;
2. Distinguish between currently serving jailers and jailers who have
previously served; and
3. Identify the county in which the cardholder holds or held the office of
jailer;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2026 9:34 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2054
(d) The costs of the jailer service card to be paid by the applicant, which shall
not exceed the actual cost of producing the physical card; and
(e) Any other matters required to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2026 9:34 AM Jacketed